Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1215
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of section 50-1213 or who otherwise willfully obstructs or hinders the conduct of a performance audit or preaudit inquiry or who willfully misleads or attempts to mislead any person charged with the duty of conducting a performance audit or preaudit inquiry shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 18;

Laws 2006, LB 588, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB539, § 5.